Hawaii statutes.
[§266-2.2] Exemption from
conservation district permitting and site plan approval requirements.
Notwithstanding any law to the contrary, all work involving submerged lands
used for state commercial harbor purposes shall be exempt from any permitting
and site plan approval requirements established for lands in a conservation
district. [L 2013, c 86, §1]

Previous
Vol05_Ch0261-0319
Next